apertium-ltz.ltz.dix
<pardef n="Kl/ouschter__n_nt_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ouschter</l>  <r>ouschter<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éischter</l>  <r>ouschter<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Kn/uet__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>uet</l>       <r>uet<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iet</l>       <r>uet<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Kn/uet__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>uet</l>       <r>uet<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iet</l>       <r>uet<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Kr/aaft__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>aaft</l>      <r>aaft<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äfte</l>      <r>aaft<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Kr/aaft__n_f_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>aaft</l>      <r>aaft<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>äfte</l>      <r>aaft<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="n"/><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Kr/op__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>op</l>        <r>op<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eep</l>       <r>op<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Kr/op__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>op</l>        <r>op<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eep</l>       <r>op<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Kr/unn__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>unn</l>       <r>unn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inn</l>       <r>unn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unne</l>      <r>unn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Kr/unn__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>unn</l>       <r>unn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inn</l>       <r>unn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>unne</l>      <r>unn<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="n"/><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Krokodi/l__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lle</l>       <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Krokodi/l__n_nt_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>l</l>         <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lle</l>       <r>l<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="n"/><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="L/af__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>af</l>        <r>af<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eef</l>       <r>af<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="L/af__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>af</l>        <r>af<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eef</l>       <r>af<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="L/amm__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>amm</l>       <r>amm<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ämmer</l>     <r>amm<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="L/amm__n_nt_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>amm</l>       <r>amm<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ämmer</l>     <r>amm<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="M/ann__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>ann</l>       <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änner</l>     <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="M/ann__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ann</l>       <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>änner</l>     <r>ann<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="M/o__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ee</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="M/o__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>o</l>         <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ee</l>        <r>o<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="M/od__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>od</l>        <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eed</l>       <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="M/od__n_f_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>od</l>        <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eed</l>       <r>od<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="M/ond__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>ond</l>       <r>ond<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ënner</l>     <r>ond<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="M/ond__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ond</l>       <r>ond<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ënner</l>     <r>ond<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="M/ount__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>ount</l>      <r>ount<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éint</l>      <r>ount<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="M/ount__n_m_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ount</l>      <r>ount<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>éint</l>      <r>ount<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Ma/ul__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>ul</l>        <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iler</l>      <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Ma/ul__n_f_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>ul</l>        <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>iler</l>      <r>ul<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Ma/us__n_nt">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Ma/us__n_nt_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>us</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>is</l>        <r>us<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Margréi/tchen__n_f">
  <e>       <p><l>tche</l>      <r>tchen<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dercher</l>   <r>tchen<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="Margréi/tchen__n_f_lower">
  <e>       <p><l>tche</l>      <r>tchen<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="n"/><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>dercher</l>   <r>tchen<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="lower"/></r></p><par n="cmp-R"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="Medezi/n__n_m">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p><par n="cmp-L"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nne</l>       <r>n<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p><par n="n"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="Klouschter">      <i>kl</i><par n="Kl/ouschter__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Knuet">           <i>Kn</i><par n="Kn/uet__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Knuet">           <i>kn</i><par n="Kn/uet__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Kraaft">          <i>Kr</i><par n="Kr/aaft__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Kraaft">          <i>kr</i><par n="Kr/aaft__n_f_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Krokodil">        <i>Krokodi</i><par n="Krokodi/l__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Krokodil">        <i>krokodi</i><par n="Krokodi/l__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Krop">            <i>Kr</i><par n="Kr/op__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Krop">            <i>kr</i><par n="Kr/op__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Krunn">           <i>Kr</i><par n="Kr/unn__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Krunn">           <i>kr</i><par n="Kr/unn__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Laf">             <i>L</i><par n="L/af__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Laf">             <i>l</i><par n="L/af__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Lamm">            <i>L</i><par n="L/amm__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Lamm">            <i>l</i><par n="L/amm__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Mann">            <i>M</i><par n="M/ann__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Mann">            <i>m</i><par n="M/ann__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Margréitchen">    <i>Margréi</i><par n="Margréi/tchen__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Margréitchen">    <i>margréi</i><par n="Margréi/tchen__n_f_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Maul">            <i>Ma</i><par n="Ma/ul__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Maul">            <i>ma</i><par n="Ma/ul__n_f_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Maus">            <i>Ma</i><par n="Ma/us__n_nt"/></e>
<e lm="Maus">            <i>ma</i><par n="Ma/us__n_nt_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Medezin">         <i>Medezi</i><par n="Medezi/n__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Mo">              <i>M</i><par n="M/o__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Mo">              <i>m</i><par n="M/o__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Mod">             <i>M</i><par n="M/od__n_f"/></e>
<e lm="Mod">             <i>m</i><par n="M/od__n_f_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Mond">            <i>M</i><par n="M/ond__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Mond">            <i>m</i><par n="M/ond__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Mount">           <i>M</i><par n="M/ount__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Mount">           <i>m</i><par n="M/ount__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Mëllechmann">     <i>Mëllechm</i><par n="M/ann__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Mëllechmann">     <i>mëllechm</i><par n="M/ann__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Waassermann">     <i>Waasserm</i><par n="M/ann__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Waassermann">     <i>waasserm</i><par n="M/ann__n_m_lower"/></e>
<e lm="Zammermann">      <i>Zammerm</i><par n="M/ann__n_m"/></e>
<e lm="Zammermann">      <i>zammerm</i><par n="M/ann__n_m_lower"/></e>
